Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20209-615.01
Lottery worker,
defined.

Lottery worker shall mean any person, other than a keno writer, who
performs work directly related to the conduct of a lottery, including, but
not limited to, winning
number selection, winning number verification, record keeping, shift
checkout and review of keno writer banks, and security.

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 49;

Laws 2014, LB259, § 4.